Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6621YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2306 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Individualized education 1 programs and section 504 plan requirements. 2 1. Each teacher employed by a school district who teaches 3 a student who has an individualized education program shall 4 read the individualized education program. After the teacher 5 has read the individualized education program, the teacher 6 shall provide written notice to the special education teacher 7 who is on the studentâs individualized education program 8 team indicating that the teacher has read the individualized 9 education program. 10 2. Each teacher employed by the school district who teaches 11 a student who has a plan under section 504 of the federal 12 Rehabilitation Act, 29 U.S.C. Â§794, shall read the plan. After 13 the teacher has read the plan, the teacher shall provide 14 written notice to any special education teacher who provides 15 special education services to the student, or to the principal 16 of the attendance center, indicating that the teacher has read 17 the plan. 18 3. Each employee of the school district who assists a 19 teacher in providing classroom instruction to a student who has 20 an individualized education program, or to a student who has a 21 plan under section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act, 29 22 U.S.C. Â§794, shall attend all meetings related to the studentâs 23 individualized education program or plan under section 504 of 24 the federal Rehabilitation Act, 29 U.S.C. Â§794, unless the 25 studentâs parent or guardian objects to the attendance of the 26 employee. 27 Sec. 2. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 28 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 29 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 30 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 31 received by the school district under section 257.16. This 32 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 33 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 34 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 35 -1- LSB 6621YH (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 H.F. 2306 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 1 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 2 districts. 3